Utah statutes.
36-5-1.   Reservation of area for Legislature -- Duties of Legislative
Management Committee.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Architectural integrity" means the architectural elements, materials,
color, and quality of the original building construction.
(b)  "Capitol hill" means the grounds, monuments, parking areas, buildings,
and other man-made and natural objects within the area bounded by 300 North
Street, Columbus Street, 500 North Street, and East Capitol Boulevard, and
includes:
(i)  the White Community Memorial Chapel and its grounds and parking areas,
and the Council Hall Travel Information Center building and its grounds and
parking areas;
(ii)  the Daughters of the Utah Pioneers building and its grounds and parking
areas and other state-owned property included within the area bounded by
Columbus Street, North Main Street, and Apricot Avenue;
(iii)  the state-owned property included within the area bounded by Columbus
Street, Wall Street, and 400 North Street; and
(iv)  the state-owned property included within the area bounded by Columbus
Street, West Capitol Street, and 500 North Street.
(c)  "House Building" means the west building on capitol hill that is located
northwest of the State Capitol and southwest of the State Office Building.
(d)  "Legislative area" means the buildings, chambers, rooms, hallways,
lounges, parking lots, and parking garages designated by this section as being
subject to legislative control.
(e)  "Senate Building" means the east building on capitol hill that is located
northeast of the State Capitol and southeast of the State Office Building.
(f)  "State Capitol" means the building dedicated as the Utah State Capitol in
1916.
(g)  "State Capitol Preservation Board" or "board" is as created in Section
63C-9-201.
(2)  The legislative area on capitol hill includes:
(a)  in the State Capitol:
(i)  on the fourth floor: the entire floor and the stairs and elevators on the
east and west side, except the four art galleries and the four closets on the
interior of the State Capitol which are immediately around the art galleries
are under the supervision of the board;
(ii)  on the third floor: the entire floor, including the stairs and elevators
on the east and west side of the third floor, except:
(A)  the Supreme Court chambers which is to be controlled and scheduled by the
Legislature during any general or special session of the Legislature and on
interim days and controlled and scheduled by the Secretary of the Senate on
all other days;
(B)  one office on the southeast side by the Senate Rules Room which is to be
controlled by the Senate during any general or special session of the
Legislature and on interim days, and shared with the Supreme Court as
scheduled through the Secretary of the Senate on all other days; and
(C)  the Senate Rules Room, which Senate Rules Room is to be controlled by the
Senate during any general or special session of the Legislature and on interim
days, and shared with the Supreme Court as scheduled through the Secretary of
the Senate on all other days;
(iii)  on the second floor: a committee room on the northeast side which is to
be controlled and scheduled by the Legislature during any general or special
session of the Legislature and on interim days and controlled and scheduled by
the State Capitol Preservation Board on all other days;
(iv)  on the first floor: no legislative space; and
(v)  on the basement level:
(A)  the Office of Legislative Printing; and
(B)  the audio/video control rooms are to be controlled by the Legislature and
the governor and scheduled by the Legislature, and the maintenance of the
control rooms shall be by the State Capitol Preservation Board at the
direction of the Legislature and the governor;
(b)  the entire House Building;
(c)  in the Senate Building:
(i)  on the third floor: no legislative space;
(ii)  on the second floor: the entire floor, including the secured elevator,
are legislative space;
(iii)  on the first floor: the secured corridor to the secured elevator is
legislative and executive space controlled by the State Capitol Preservation
Board; and
(iv)  on the basement level: the secured elevator is legislative space; and
(d) (i)  the parking stalls in the underground parking facility located
directly east of the House Building and below the central plaza;
(ii)  52 of the parking stalls in the above ground parking lot known as Lot G
located north of the House Building and west of the State Office Building;
(iii)  26 of the parking stalls in the underground parking located directly
under the Senate Building; and
(iv)  47 of the parking stalls in the underground parking facility directly
east of the Senate Building.
(3) (a)  The legislative area is reserved for the use and occupancy of the
Legislature and its committees and for legislative functions.
(b)  The Legislative Management Committee shall delegate oversight of
designated portions of the legislative parking areas to the State Capitol
Preservation Board for use by the executive branch on nonlegislative days.
(4)  The data centers in the House Building, Senate Building, and State
Capitol which are associated with the House, Senate, or legislative staff
space are the responsibility of the Legislature, and the maintenance of these
data centers shall be by the State Capitol Preservation Board at the direction
of the Legislature.
(5)  The Legislative Management Committee shall exercise complete jurisdiction
over the legislative area, except for the following, which are the
responsibility of the State Capitol Preservation Board:
(a)  the architectural integrity of the legislative area, including:
(i)  restored historic architectural or design features;
(ii)  historic color schemes, decorative finishes, and stenciling;
(iii)  decorative light fixtures; and
(iv)  flooring;
(b)  control of the central mechanical and electrical core of the House
Building, Senate Building, and State Capitol on all floors;
(c)  control of the enclosure of the House Building, Senate Building, and
State Capitol from the exterior of the building to the interior of the
exterior wall;
(d)  the roof of the House Building, Senate Building, and State Capitol;
(e)  the utility and security tunnels between the underground parking
structure and the House Building, Senate Building, and State Capitol;
(f)  rest rooms of the House Building, Senate Building, and State Capitol;
(g)  maintenance of all the elevators and stairways in the House Building,
Senate Building, and State Capitol; and
(h)  those functions the Legislative Management Committee delegates in writing
to be performed by the State Capitol Preservation Board.
(6) (a)  The communications centers in the Senate Building and State Capitol
which are associated with the House, Senate, or legislative staff space or are
associated with the governor, lieutenant governor, or their staff space are
the shared responsibility of the State Capitol Preservation Board, the
Legislature, and the governor.
(b)  The communications centers in the House Building which are associated
with the House, Senate, or legislative staff space are the shared
responsibility of the State Capitol Preservation Board and the Legislature.
